Hawaii, session 2026, GM4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
PART II
SECTION 2. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund collective
bargaining cost items associated with grievances filed under
agreements negotiated with the exclusive representative of
collective bargaining units (1) and (10), and for their excluded
counterparts. The amounts are for arbitration awards for the
university of Hawaii and other executive branch departments
related to temporary hazard pay. These amounts are in addition
to the amounts provided in Act 29, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025:

Page 2 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
PROPOSED
FY 2025-2026
General funds $66,795,019
Interdepartmental transfers 306,532
Revolving funds 203,736
SECTION 3. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in fiscal year 2025-2026 for
the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 4. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds; provided that if the respective funds
are unable to support such payments, appropriations from other
means of financing may be used with the approval of the
Governor.
SECTION 5. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall
lapse as of that date.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
PROPOSED